Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 29
IMMIGRATION STATUS -
COOPERATION WITH FEDERAL OFFICIALS

29-29-101 to 29-29-103. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article repealed, (HB 13-1258), ch. 149, p. 478, § 2, effective April 26.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 2006 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2013. For the text of this article prior to 2013, consult the 2012 Colorado Revised Statutes.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act repealing this article, see section 1 of chapter 149, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.